Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 16-112, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 16-112. A. When the municipal governing body shall


deem it advisable, it may, by resolution or ordinance, authorize the


mayor to call a special election on a date established in Section 3-


101 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes for the purpose of


submitting to the registered voters of the municipality the question


of issuing municipal bonds, of granting any franchise, or for any


other purpose authorized by law.



Req. No. 3467 Page 1


B. Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of submitting to


the registered voters of the municipality the quest municipal bonds


or of any tax, the governing body may, by resolution or ordinance,


authorize the mayor to call a special election on a state or federal


election day in November in an odd- or even-numbered year.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 15-102, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 15-102. The Notwithstanding any other law, the board of


education shall call an election to be held on a state or federal


election day in November in an odd- or even-numbered year, to which


shall be conducted by the county election board in all respects as


other elections, for the purpose of taking the sense of the district


upon the question of issuing such bonds, naming in the proclamation


of such election the amount of bonds to be voted on and the purpose


for which they are to be issued; and it shall cause to be published


in a newspaper of general circulation in said the district the time


and place of such election, such notices to be given at least ten


(10) days before such election. In all instances where


proclamations for elections for boards of education are required by


statute of the mayor of a city, and in all instances where elections


for boards of education are provided for by statute wherein the


mayor and city clerk are denominated, the president of the board of


education shall be substituted for the mayor and the clerk of the


board of education shall be substituted for the city clerk. Boards

Req. No. 3467 Page 2


of education are hereby declared to be free and independent of


cities in all matters relating to school elections legally called


upon all school matters, and presidents of boards of education shall


have full power to issue proclamations calling school elections;


provided, that no election shall be called on the same proposition


within four (4) months after such proposition has been defeated at


an election by the school district electors. The provisions of this


act section as to the waiting period shall not apply where the


school facilities have been destroyed by an act of God. The cost of


such elections, together with the cost of such proclamations,


publication, notices or other expenses required, shall be legal


costs of boards of education.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3467 YG 1/15/2026 2:34:20 PM











Req. No. 3467 Page 3